Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.070

Terms of members.

The terms of the members of commission shall be staggered and each shall serve for a term of three years and until their successor has been appointed and qualified: PROVIDED, That the first appointments to the commission beginning July 30, 1969, shall be for the following terms:

(1) Positions one, four, and seven, one year.

(2) Positions two, five, and eight, two years.

(3) Positions three, six, and nine, three years.

[ 1969 c 129 s 7.]